Massachusetts, session 194th, H3415.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94 of chapter 143 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following paragraph:-
(s) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to promulgate rules and
regulations as part of the state building code mandating liability for contractors who perform
work without a required permit including, but not limited to, permits required by the state
building code, a municipality, section 40 of chapter 131, chapter 91 or any other permits required
by the General Laws. The rules and regulations shall include fines for contractors who perform
work without a required permit and shall mandate that contractors obtain permits personally or
retain copies of permits provided by a landowner for a reasonable time, to be provided to
permitting authorities upon request.
of 1